Utah statutes.
41-1a-1219.   Motor carrier fee.

(1)  At the time application is made for registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles over 12,000 pounds gross laden weight, the applicant shall pay a motor carrier fee of $6 for each motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles.

(2)  This fee is in addition to the registration fees under Subsections 41-1a-1206(1)(d) and (e).

